Utah statutes.
63M-1-602.   Definition of terms.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Adviser" means the state science adviser appointed under this part.

(2)  "Council" means the State Advisory Council on Science and Technology created under this part.

(3)  "Director" means the governor's director for economic development.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

